North Dakota, session 69, SB2136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 5-04-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
5-04-02. Inducement or coercion prohibited.
NoA brewer may not:
1. Induce or coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, anya beer wholesaler to accept delivery of
anyan alcoholic beverage or any other commodity which has not been ordered by the beer
wholesaler.
2. Induce or coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, anya beer wholesaler to enter anyan
agreement or take anyan action that would violate anya law or rule of this state by threatening
to amend, cancel, terminate, or refuse to renew anyan agreement existing between a brewer
and a beer wholesaler.
3. Require a wholesaler to assent to anya condition, stipulation, or provision limiting the
wholesaler's right to sell any other brewer's product anywhere in this state, provided the sale
of another brewer's product does not materially impair the quality of service or quantity of
sales of the existing brand or brands of the brewer seeking to impose the condition,
stipulation, or provision.
4. Require a wholesaler to submit specific, confidential information regarding competitive brands,
as a condition of renewal or continuation of an agreement.
5. Fail to provide each wholesaler of its brands with a written contract whichthat conforms to this
chapter and embodies the brewer's agreement with each wholesaler.
6. Require a wholesaler to use or prohibit a wholesaler from using a business - to - business
electronic commerce platform.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 5-04-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
5-04-14. Sale of brewer.
Except for good cause, as defined by section 5-04-04, the purchase of a brewer as defined in
section 5-04-01, when the purchaser continues in business as a brewer, shall obligate the new
brewerpurchaser to all terms and conditions of the agreement in effect on the date of purchase.
"Purchase", for the purposes of this chapter, includes the sale of stock, sale of assets, merger, lease,
transfer, or consolidation.

S. B. NO. 2136 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2136.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State